test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_VV_gookookohoo_gt-norm.yaml
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nigookookohooshinaanidig, nigookookohooshinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Loc: gigookookohooshinaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Obv: gigookookohooshinaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+Pret+Pl: gigookookohooshinaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohooshinaanidig, gigookookohooshinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohooshinaanidig, gigookookohooshinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+21+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohooshinaanidig, gigookookohooshinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gigookookohooshiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gigookookohooshiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gigookookohooshiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohooshiwaadig, gigookookohooshiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohooshiwaadig, gigookookohooshiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohooshiwaadig, gigookookohooshiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ogookookohooshiniibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ogookookohooshiniibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ogookookohooshiniibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohooshiniidig, ogookookohooshiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohooshiniidig, ogookookohooshiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohooshiniidig, ogookookohooshiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ogookookohooshiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ogookookohooshiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ogookookohooshiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohooshiwaadig, ogookookohooshiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohooshiwaadig, ogookookohooshiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Pej+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohooshiwaadig, ogookookohooshiwaadog]
     
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nigookookohoonyimishinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nigookookohoonyimishinaanidig, nigookookohoonyimishinaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pret: nigookookohoonsimishinaaniban
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+VocPl: [nigookookohoonsimishinaanidig, nigookookohoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gigookookohoonyimishinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gigookookohoonyimishinaanidig, gigookookohoonyimishinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gigookookohoonyimishiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gigookookohoonyimishiwaadig, gigookookohoonyimishiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pret: gigookookohoonsimishinaaniban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+VocPl: [gigookookohoonsimishinaanidig, gigookookohoonsimishinaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pret: gigookookohoonsimishiwaaban
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+VocPl: [gigookookohoonsimishiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: ogookookohoonyimishiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [ogookookohoonyimishiniidig, ogookookohoonyimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: ogookookohoonyimishiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [ogookookohoonyimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimishiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pret: ogookookohoonsimishiniiban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+VocPl: [ogookookohoonsimishiniidig, ogookookohoonsimishiniidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pret: ogookookohoonsimishiwaaban
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+VocPl: [ogookookohoonsimishiwaadig, ogookookohoonsimishiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonyimishinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nigookookohoonyimishinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishinaanig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Loc: nigookookohoonsimishinaaning
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Obv: nigookookohoonsimishinaanin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+1Pl+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gigookookohoonyimishinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gigookookohoonyimishiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishiwaag
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishinaaning
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Obv: gigookookohoonsimishinaanin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+21+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishinaanig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishiwaang
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Obv: gigookookohoonsimishiwaan
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+2Pl+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: ogookookohoonyimishiniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: ogookookohoonyimishiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishiwaag
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Obv: ogookookohoonsimishiniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Obv+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishiwaang
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Obv: ogookookohoonsimishiwaan
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+3Pl+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishiwaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonyimishibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonyimishibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonyimishibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonsimishibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonsimishibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonsimishibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonyimishibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonyimishibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonyimishibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonsimishibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonsimishibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonsimishibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonyimishibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonyimishibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonyimishibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonsimishibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonsimishibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonsimishibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: igookookohoonyimishibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: igookookohoonyimishibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: igookookohoonyimishibaniig
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: igookookohoonsimishibaniing
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: igookookohoonsimishibaniin
     X+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: igookookohoonsimishibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonyiminaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonyiminaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonyiminaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nigookookohoonyiminaanidig, nigookookohoonyiminaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nigookookohoonyiminaanidig, nigookookohoonyiminaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nigookookohoonyiminaanidig, nigookookohoonyiminaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Loc: nigookookohoonsiminaanibaniing
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Obv: nigookookohoonsiminaanibaniin
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+1Pl+Pret+Pl: nigookookohoonsiminaanibaniig
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Loc: [nigookookohoonsiminaanidig, nigookookohoonsiminaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Obv: [nigookookohoonsiminaanidig, nigookookohoonsiminaanidog]
     1+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+1Pl+VocPl+Pl: [nigookookohoonsiminaanidig, nigookookohoonsiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonyiminaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonyiminaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonyiminaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoonyiminaanidig, gigookookohoonyiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoonyiminaanidig, gigookookohoonyiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoonyiminaanidig, gigookookohoonyiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonyimiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonyimiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonyimiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoonyimiwaadig, gigookookohoonyimiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoonyimiwaadig, gigookookohoonyimiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoonyimiwaadig, gigookookohoonyimiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+21+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonsiminaanibaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+21+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonsiminaanibaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+21+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonsiminaanibaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoonsiminaanidig, gigookookohoonsiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoonsiminaanidig, gigookookohoonsiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+21+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoonsiminaanidig, gigookookohoonsiminaanidog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Loc: gigookookohoonsimiwaabaniing
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Obv: gigookookohoonsimiwaabaniin
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+2Pl+Pret+Pl: gigookookohoonsimiwaabaniig
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Loc: [gigookookohoonsimiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Obv: [gigookookohoonsimiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimiwaadog]
     2+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+2Pl+VocPl+Pl: [gigookookohoonsimiwaadig, gigookookohoonsimiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonyiminiibaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonyiminiibaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonyiminiibaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoonyiminiidig, ogookookohoonyiminiidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoonyiminiidig, ogookookohoonyiminiidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Obv+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoonyiminiidig, ogookookohoonyiminiidog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonyimiwaabaniing
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Obv: ogookookohoonyimiwaabaniin
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Pl+Pret+Pl: ogookookohoonyimiwaabaniig
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Loc: [ogookookohoonyimiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Obv: [ogookookohoonyimiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Con+Pos+3Pl+VocPl+Pl: [ogookookohoonyimiwaadig, ogookookohoonyimiwaadog]
     3+gookookohoo+NA+Dim+Pos+3Obv+Pret+Loc: ogookookohoonsiminiibaniing
